pazar.laz.lexc
@D.MOOD.INVABL@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [INV]oluntary & [ABL](ability) [MOOD]

@P.IMPASS.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [IM]personal [PASS]ive
@R.IMPASS.PRS@	! [R]equires paths set as [P]ositive for [IM]personal [PASS]ive
@N.IMPASS.PRS@	! [N]egative setting for [IM]personal [PASS]ive
@D.IMPASS.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [IM]personal [PASS]ive

@P.ANTICAUS.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [ANTICAUS]ative as [PRS](present)
@N.ANTICAUS.PRS@	! [N]egative setting for [ANTICAUS]ative as [PRS](present)

@P.ASP.PREPERF@	! [P]ositive setting for [PRE]sent [PERF]ect [ASP]ect
@N.ASP.PREPERF@	! [N]egative setting for [PRE]sent [PERF]ect [ASP]ect
@R.ASP.PREPERF@	! [R]equires paths set as [P]ositive for [PRE]sent [PERF]ect [ASP]ect

@P.PERF.MARKER@	! [P]ositive setting for present [PERF]ect [MARKER]
@D.PERF.MARKER@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with present [PERF]ect [MARKER]
@N.PERF.MARKER@	! [N]egative setting for present [PERF]ect [MARKER]

@P.INVABL.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [INV]oluntary & [ABL](ability) as [PRS](present)
@D.INVABL.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [INV]oluntary & [ABL](ability) as [PRS](present)
@N.INVABL.PRS@	! [N]egative setting for [INV]oluntary & [ABL](ability) as [PRS](present)

@P.CAUSVAL.MARKER@	! [P]ositive setting for [CAUS]ative [MARKER]s as both [VAL]ency related vowel and [CAUS]ative suffix
@D.CAUSVAL.MARKER@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [CAUS]ative [MARKER]s as both [VAL]ency related vowel and [CAUS]ative suffix

@P.PERFSUF.MARKER@	! [P]ositive setting for present [PERF]ect [MARKER] (as and overt [SUF]fix)

@P.IMPF.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [IMPF](imperfective) as [PRS](present) (makes the path available for imperfective structures)

@P.TNS.PST@	! [P]ositive setting for [PST](past) [TNS](tense)
@D.TNS.PST@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [PST](past) [TNS](tense)

@P.TNS.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [PRS](present) [TNS](tense)
@R.TNS.PRS@	! [R]equires paths set as [P]ositive for [PRS](present) [TNS](tense)
@D.TNS.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [PRS](present) [TNS](tense)
@N.TNS.PRS@	! [N]egative setting for [PRS](present) [TNS](tense)

@P.MARKER.THM@	! [P]ositive setting for [THM](thematic) [MARKER]

@P.PLU.ABS@	! [P]ositive setting for [PLU]ral information [ABS]ence
@D.PLU.ABS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [PLU]ral information [ABS]ence

@P.PLU.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [PLU]ral information [PRS](presence)

@P.COND.UNREAL@	! [P]ositive setting for [UNREAL] [COND]itional
@D.COND.UNREAL@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [UNREAL] [COND]itional

@P.PLU.3@	! [P]ositive setting for [3]rd person [PLU]ral suffix
@D.PLU.3@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [3]rd person [PLU]ral suffix

@P.MARKER.SUBJ@	! [P]ositive setting for [SUBJ]unctive [MARKER]
@N.MARKER.SUBJ@	! [N]egative setting for [SUBJ]unctive [MARKER]
@R.MARKER.SUBJ@	! [R]equires paths set as [P]ositive for [SUBJ]unctive [MARKER]

@P.UNREAL3.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [3]rd person marker [PRS](presence) if plural for [UNREAL] conditional structure
@D.UNREAL3.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [3]rd person marker [PRS](presence) if plural for [UNREAL] conditional structure

@P.THM.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [THM](thematic) suffix to be [PRS](present)
@D.THM.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [THM](thematic) suffix to be [PRS](present)
@N.THM.PRS@	! [N]egative setting for [THM](thematic) suffix to be [PRS](present)

@P.PART.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [PART]iciple construction to be [PRS](present)
@D.PART.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [PART]iciple construction to be [PRS](present)
@R.PART.PRS@	! [R]equires paths set as [P]ositive for [PART]iciple construction to be [PRS](present)

@P.SUPL.UR@	! [P]ositive setting for [SUPL]etion construction which takes [UR] thematic suffix
@D.SUPL.UR@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [SUPL]etion construction which takes [UR] thematic suffix

@P.SUPL.UM@	! [P]ositive setting for [SUPL]etion construction which takes [UM] thematic suffix
@D.SUPL.UM@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [SUPL]etion construction which takes [UM] thematic suffix

@P.PERSON.ABS@	! [P]ositive setting for [PERSON] information to be [ABS]ent
@D.PERSON.ABS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [PERSON] information to be [ABS]ent

@P.PLU3.PRS@	! [P]ositive setting for [3]rd person [PLU]ral to be [PRS](present) (for conditional structure where person marking is noncontinuous)
@D.PLU3.PRS@	! [D]isallowing paths marked as [P]ositive with [3]rd person [PLU]ral to be [PRS](present) (for conditional structure where person marking is noncontinuous)

%{R%}		! archiphoneme [r] or 0
%{V%}		! archiphoneme [v] or 0
%{B%}		! archiphoneme [v], [b], [p], [m], [ṕ] or 0	(v-set person subject)
%{G%}		! archiphoneme [g], [k] or [k']		(m-set person object)

%{I%}		! archiphoneme [i] or [y]
%{I2%}		! archiphoneme [i] or [e]
%{A%}		! archiphoneme [a] or 0 
%{O%}		! archiphoneme [o] (before i, u and o), [v] (before a) or [e] (with person agrement prefix and valency pre-vowels) or 0
%{E%}		! archiphoneme [e] (before a, i, o and u) or 0
%{E2%}
%{S%}
%{M%}
%{N%}
%{A5%}
%{A4%}
%{A3%}
%{A3.2%}
%{O3.1%}
%{O3.2%}
%{O2.1%}
%{O2.2%}
%{O2.3%}
%{O2.4%}
%{O4%}
%{O5%}
%{R1%}
%{E1%}
%{SS%}

%>

!--------------NOM-CONJ-INTERJ----------------!

LEXICON Root

AffirmativePreverb;		! for verbs

Nouns;
Pronouns;
Adjectives;			! needs lexemes
Adverbs;			! needs lexemes
Numerals;			! after going over the corpus
Reflexives;
Interjections;
Quantifiers;
Coordination;
PostPosition;
PrePosition;
Negation;
Subordinator;
Adverbial;

LEXICON Subordinator

%<sub%>:na Negation;
%<sub%>:yado #;		! 2nd person
%<sub%>:mado #;		! 1st person

LEXICON Adverbial

%<adv%>mundes #;		! when
%<adv%>muḉe #;			! as soon as


LEXICON Plural

Case;
%<pl%>:%>pe Case;
@R.LEPE.PRS@%<pl%>:@R.LEPE.PRS@%>lepe Case;	! 'only with some nouns starting with 'a''
@R.LEPE.PRS@%<pl%>:@R.LEPE.PRS@%>epe Case;

LEXICON AdditiveNoun

#;
%<add%>:%>ti #;			! 'too' used as a suffix

LEXICON Case

AdditiveNoun;
%<nom%>: AdditiveNoun;		
%<erg%>:%>k AdditiveNoun;		
%<dat%>:%>s AdditiveNoun;
%<all%>:%>şe AdditiveNoun;		! 'direction'
%<abl%>:%>şen AdditiveNoun;		! 'source'
%<abl%>:%>şe AdditiveNoun;		! 'source'
%<abl%>:%>şa AdditiveNoun;		! 'source'
%<gen%>:%>şi AdditiveNoun;		! 'possessor'
%<inst%>:%>te AdditiveNoun;

LEXICON	Negation

#;
mot%<neg%>:mot #;
mo%<neg%>:mo #;
var%<neg%>:var #;		! also va!!!!!!!
vati%<neg%>:vati #;		! Sub;

LEXICON	Coordination			! change it to coordti

mara%<conj%>:mara #;
mecere%<conj%>:mecere #;
oťi%<conj%>:oťi #;

do%<conj%>:do #;
hem%<conj%>:hem AdditiveNoun;

ama%<conj%>:ama #;
varti%<conj%>:varti #;
habuçi%<conj%>:habuçi #;

vana%<disj%>:vana #;		! disjunc
ya%<disj%>:ya AdditiveNoun;

ne%<rej%>:ne AdditiveNoun;	! rej


LEXICON PrePosition

ṕi%<prep%>:ṕi #;			! oncesi, den once
na%<prep%>:na #;
muḉe%<prep%>:muḉe #;			!  den başka, - dan başka

LEXICON Numerals
maovrani%<num%>%<ord%>:maovrani Plural;		! ordinals: sekizinci
LEXICON Adverbs
dido%<adv%>:dido Plural;
miťiloz%{I2%}%<adv%>:miťiloz%{I2%} Plural;
tijile%<adv%>:tijile Plural;
hakele%<adv%>:hakele Plural;
berebur%{I2%}%<adv%>:berebur%{I2%} Plural;
mosvacinon%{I2%}%<adv%>:mosvacinon%{I2%} Plural;
LEXICON Nouns
tekerleme%<n%>:%>tekerleme Plural;
ḉirťḉirť%{I2%}%<n%>:%>ḉirťḉirť%{I2%} Plural;
kçeş%{I2%}%<n%>:%>kçeş%{I2%} Plural;
limsa%<n%>:%>limsa Plural;
mlud%{I2%}%<n%>:%>mlud%{I2%} Plural;
ojvaťon%{I2%}%<n%>:%>ojvaťon%{I2%} Plural;
sipar%{I2%}%<n%>:%>sipar%{I2%} Plural;
gamaǩuʒxinu%<n%>:gamaǩuʒxinu Plural;
obadu%<n%>:obadu Plural;
oʒiʒxilu%<n%>:oʒiʒxilu Plural;
ceḉonu%<n%>:ceḉonu Plural;
cepeleǩu%<n%>:cepeleǩu Plural;
dorinu%<n%>:dorinu Plural;
dolonduru%<n%>:dolonduru Plural;
doloǯunu%<n%>:doloǯunu Plural;
edginu%<n%>:edginu Plural;
eǩaşvelu%<n%>:eǩaşvelu Plural;
elakçinu%<n%>:elakçinu Plural;
elaşinaxu%<n%>:elaşinaxu Plural;
eoragadu%<n%>:eoragadu Plural;
eyoburdu%<n%>:eyoburdu Plural;
eǯomgutu%<n%>:eǯomgutu Plural;
gamaçxalu%<n%>:gamaçxalu Plural;
gamapsalu%<n%>:gamapsalu Plural;
geçxalu%<n%>:geçxalu Plural;
gelamḉimu%<n%>:gelamḉimu Plural;
cesǩvalu%<n%>:cesǩvalu Plural;
gobaru%<n%>:gobaru Plural;
goǩuǩaru%<n%>:goǩuǩaru Plural;
gomťalu%<n%>:gomťalu Plural;
gosťomu%<n%>:gosťomu Plural;
gotvalu%<n%>:gotvalu Plural;
gozgimoḉu%<n%>:gozgimoḉu Plural;
goǯelimu%<n%>:goǯelimu Plural;
meḉibru%<n%>:meḉibru Plural;
meǩatu%<n%>:meǩatu Plural;
menḉunu%<n%>:menḉunu Plural;
meşalu%<n%>:meşalu Plural;
meťoçu%<n%>:meťoçu Plural;
meʒonu%<n%>:meʒonu Plural;
moǩobğalu%<n%>:moǩobğalu Plural;
moloǯamu%<n%>:moloǯamu Plural;
moyoçvalu%<n%>:moyoçvalu Plural;
obincolu%<n%>:obincolu Plural;
oçxu%<n%>:oçxu Plural;
ogzapu%<n%>:ogzapu Plural;
sap%<n%>:sap Plural;
oǩoǩaxu%<n%>:oǩoǩaxu Plural;
oǩoragadu%<n%>:oǩoragadu Plural;
oǩuǩunǯu%<n%>:oǩuǩunǯu Plural;
omǩulanu%<n%>:omǩulanu Plural;
onḉilu%<n%>:onḉilu Plural;
opatxalu%<n%>:opatxalu Plural;
osaru%<n%>:osaru Plural;
oťangalu%<n%>:oťangalu Plural;
oxlinḉǩu%<n%>:oxlinḉǩu Plural;
oziťu%<n%>:oziťu Plural;
uğun%<n%>:uğun Plural;
dolodgitu%<n%>:dolodgitu Plural;
doskidu%<n%>:doskidu Plural;
eǩasinapu%<n%>:eǩasinapu Plural;
elaonu%<n%>:elaonu Plural;
eşaboinu%<n%>:eşaboinu Plural;
eoxedu%<n%>:eoxedu Plural;
gamakaçu%<n%>:gamakaçu Plural;
gecoxu%<n%>:gecoxu Plural;
genǩoru%<n%>:genǩoru Plural;
geluru%<n%>:geluru Plural;
gesvalu%<n%>:gesvalu Plural;
gežiʒinu%<n%>:gežiʒinu Plural;
golosku%<n%>:golosku Plural;
goşanḉalu%<n%>:goşanḉalu Plural;
goǯaḉǩoru%<n%>:goǯaḉǩoru Plural;
goǯǩumu%<n%>:goǯǩumu Plural;
meǩonu%<n%>:meǩonu Plural;
mestvalu%<n%>:mestvalu Plural;
meagubu%<n%>:meagubu Plural;
moǩasvaru%<n%>:moǩasvaru Plural;
moadgitinu%<n%>:moadgitinu Plural;
oḉandu%<n%>:oḉandu Plural;
oǩogubu%<n%>:oǩogubu Plural;
olazu%<n%>:olazu Plural;
onžgipu%<n%>:onžgipu Plural;
oşuvu%<n%>:oşuvu Plural;
ozayanu%<n%>:ozayanu Plural;
oǩusinu%<n%>:oǩusinu Plural;
gemjoru%<n%>:gemjoru Plural;
meḉǩiru%<n%>:meḉǩiru Plural;
xçanapa%<n%>:xçanapa Plural;
oxraǩu%<n%>:oxraǩu Plural;
oboinu%<n%>:oboinu Plural;
amazdimua%<n%>:amazdimua Plural;
gejolua%<n%>:gejolua Plural;
guǯaǩ’onua%<n%>:guǯaǩ’onua Plural;
loǩua%<n%>:loǩua Plural;
çxaťua%<n%>:çxaťua Plural;
ǯilua%<n%>:ǯilua Plural;
ǯorua%<n%>:ǯorua Plural;
oṕuxnu%<n%>:oṕuxnu Plural;
ceǩavelu%<n%>:ceǩavelu Plural;
eǩaǯomilu%<n%>:eǩaǯomilu Plural;
eǯasťurinu%<n%>:eǯasťurinu Plural;
ceşǩavelu%<n%>:ceşǩavelu Plural;
goncamu%<n%>:goncamu Plural;
ǩoǯarinu%<n%>:ǩoǯarinu Plural;
mḉima%<n%>:mḉima Plural;
oḉuxaru%<n%>:oḉuxaru Plural;
oṕurḉinu%<n%>:oṕurḉinu Plural;
gamanḉǩilu%<n%>:gamanḉǩilu Plural;
omṕau%<n%>:omṕau Plural;
ğarğalapa%<n%>:ğarğalapa Plural;
araba%<n%>:araba Plural;
boť%{I2%}%<n%>:boť%{I2%} Plural;
çala%<n%>:çala Plural;
ḉoḉoxepuna%<n%>:ḉoḉoxepuna Plural;
eçoroba%<n%>:eçoroba Plural;
gokton%{I2%}%<n%>:gokton%{I2%} Plural;
keçula%<n%>:keçula Plural;
ǩarav%{I2%}%<n%>:ǩarav%{I2%} Plural;
ǩoǯotvala%<n%>:ǩoǯotvala Plural;
longoz%{I2%}%<n%>:longoz%{I2%} Plural;
meşvale%<n%>:meşvale Plural;
mtutiçel%{I2%}%<n%>:mtutiçel%{I2%} Plural;
nobacene%<n%>:nobacene Plural;
obergaşe%<n%>:obergaşe Plural;
omçvere%<n%>:omçvere Plural;
oxoşkva%<n%>:oxoşkva Plural;
ṕaḉaura%<n%>:ṕaḉaura Plural;
Rusur%{I2%}%<n%>:Rusur%{I2%} Plural;
tabuť%{I2%}%<n%>:tabuť%{I2%} Plural;
ťiǩaniǯa%<n%>:ťiǩaniǯa Plural;
xavinoba%<n%>:xavinoba Plural;
yuz%{I2%}%<n%>:yuz%{I2%} Plural;
anḉǩera%<n%>:anḉǩera Plural;
oťriḉ%{I2%}%<n%>:oťriḉ%{I2%} Plural;
Kortula%<n%>:Kortula Plural;
ťurva%<n%>:ťurva Plural;
cerma%<n%>:cerma Plural;
nusaloba%<n%>:nusaloba Plural;
mzga%<n%>:mzga Plural;
buʒxon%{I2%}%<n%>:buʒxon%{I2%} Plural;
gnaper%{I2%}%<n%>:gnaper%{I2%} Plural;
ǩola%{I2%}%<n%>:ǩola%{I2%} Plural;
mojna%<n%>:mojna Plural;
oşumeş%{I2%}%<n%>:oşumeş%{I2%} Plural;
ťoncela%<n%>:ťoncela Plural;
zengin%{I2%}%<n%>:zengin%{I2%} Plural;
ndğer%{I2%}%<n%>:ndğer%{I2%} Plural;
orḉ%{I2%}%<n%>:orḉ%{I2%} Plural;
oşǩenda%<n%>:oşǩenda Plural;
gunželya%<n%>:gunželya Plural;
